nl: Vleessnede: Rugband; Buik; Schouder; Borsten; Klapstuk; Burgers; Wang; Karbonades; Voorvoet; Drumsticks; Flank; Voorhand; Voorschouder; Grond; Ham; Staart; Hart; Achterhand; Achterham; Jerk; Halskwab; Nier; Poten; Lever; Lendenen; Gehaktballetjes; Nek; Ossenstaart; Rack; Ribben; Romp; Zadel; Worsten; Schenkel; Korte lendenen; Korte ribben; Schouder; Entrecote; Spareribs; Stoofvlees; Zwezerik; Tenderloin; Dijen; Tong; Pens; Geheel; Vleugels; Andere
sl-SI: Del mesa: Hrbtni trak; Trebuh; Pleča; Prsa; Prsi brez kosti; Burgerji; Lica; Kotleti; Pleča; Krača; Potrebušina; Prednja četrt; Prednja rama; Zmleto; Šunka; Krača; Srce; Zadnja četrt; Prednja krača; Sušeno meso; Čeljust; Ledvica; Noge; Jetra; Ledja; Mesne kroglice; Vrat; Volovski rep; Zarebrnica; Bržola; Križ; Hrbet; Klobase; Bočnik; Nizki hrbet; Rebra; Pleče; Ledja; Rebrca; Meso za dušenje; Sladki kruhki; Pljučna; Stegna; Jezik; Vampi; Celi; Perutnice; Drugo
es: Corte de carne: Tirante trasero; Vientre; Cuchilla; Pechos; Pecho; Hamburguesas; Carrillada; Chuletas; Mandril; Baquetas; Falda; Cuarto delantero; Hombro delantero; Molido; Jamón; Anca; Corazón; Cuarto trasero; Jarrete; Cecina; Papada; Riñón; Patas; Hígado; Lomo; Albóndigas; Cuello; Rabo de buey; Bastidor; Costillas; Cuadril; Montura; Salchichas; Jarrete; Lomo corto; Costillas; Hombro; Solomillo; Costillas; Carne para estofado; Mollejas; Solomillo; Muslos; Lengua; Callos; Entero; Alitas; Otros
pt-PT: Corte de carne: Lombo; Barriga; Lâmina; Peitos; Maçã do peito; Hambúrgueres; Bochecha; Costeletas; Cachaço; Perninhas; Aba; Quarto dianteiro; Ombro frontal; Moído; Presunto; Quadril; Coração; Quartos traseiros; Jarrete; Carne desidratada; Papada; Rim; Pernas; Fígado; Vazia; Almôndegas; Pescoço; Alcatra; Estante; Costeletas de vaca; Traseiro; Selim; Salsichas; Chambão; Lombo curto; Costeletas curtas; Ombro; Lombo de vaca; Entrecosto; Carne para guisado; Molejas; Chã de fora; Coxas; Língua; Bucho; Gordo; Asas; Outro
tr: Et Kesimi: Sırt kayışı; Karın; Bıçak; Göğüsler; Göğüs eti; Burgerler; Yanak; Çene altı; Gerdan; Bagetler; Böğür; Ön gövde; Ön omuz; Toz; Jambon; Kalça; Kalp; Arka çeyrek; Diz; Kurutulmuş Et; Gıdı; Böbrek; Bacaklar; Karaciğer; Bel; Köfte; Boyun; Öküz kuyruğu; Raf; Pirzola; But; Eyer; Sosis; İncik; Kısa bonfile; Kısa kaburga; Omuz; Bonfile; Kaburga; Etli güveç; Uykuluk; Bonfile; Uyluk; Dil; Sakatat; Tüm; Kanatlar; Diğer
cs: Část masa: Hřbet; Pupek; Plecko; Prsa; Bůček; Burgery; Líčko; Kotlety; Hovězí krk; Kuřecí stehýnka; Bok; Přední čtvrtka; Přední plec; Země; Šunka; Zadní; Srdce; Zadní čtvrtka; Koleno; Sušené maso; Líce; Ledviny; Nohy; Játra; Bedra; Masové koule; Krk; Hovězí oháňka; Regál; Žebra; Kýta; Sedlo; Klobásy a párky; Koleno; Nízká roštěná; Krátká žebra; Rameno; Svíčková; Vepřová žebírka; Dušené maso; Brzlík; Pravá svíčková; Stehna; Jazyk; Dršťky; Celé; Křídla; Jiné
ru: Отруб мяса: Спинка; Подбрюшина; Лопатка; Грудинка; Грудка; Для бургеров; Щека; Отбивные; Лопаточно-шейная часть; Голени; Пашина; Передняя четверть; Передняя часть лопатки; Фарш; Ветчина; Окорок; Сердце; Задняя четверть; Рулька; Вяленое мясо; Подгрудок; Почка; Ноги; Печень; Корейка; Фрикадельки; Шея; Бычий хвост; Каре; Ребра; Гузка; Корейка; Колбаски; Голяшка; Короткий филей; Короткие ребра; Лопатка; Филейная часть; Свиные ребрышки; Тушеное мясо; Сладкое мясо; Вырезка; Бедра; Язык; Потроха; Целиком; Крылышки; Другое
da: Kød skåret: Rygstrop; Mave; Klinge; Bryster; Spidsbryst; Burgere; Kind; Koteletter; Bov; Kyllingelår; Flanke; Forpart; Forreste skulder; Jord; Skinke; Benpart; Hjerte; Bagpart; Klump; Tørrede kødstrimler (Jerky); Svinekæbe; Nyre; Ben; Lever; Lænd; Frikadeller; Nakke; Oksehale; Rack; Ribs; Rump; Sadel; Pølser; Skaft; Kort lænd; Korte ribs; Skulder; Mørbrad; Spareribs; Stegekød; Brissel; Tenderloin; Lår; Tunge; Indmad; Hel; Vinger; Andet
fr: Coupe de la viande: Sangle dorsale; Ventre; Lame; Seins; Pointe de poitrine; Hamburgers; Joue; Côtelettes; Mandrin; Pilons; Flanc; Quartier avant; Épaule avant; Sol; Jambon; Hanche; Cœur; Quartier arrière; Jarret; Viande séchée; Bajoue; Rein; Cuisses; Foie; Longe; Boulettes de viande; Cou; Soupe à la queue de bœuf; Support; Côtes; Croupe; Selle; Saucisses; Jarret; Longe courte; Côtes courtes; Épaule; Aloyau; Côtes levées; Ragoût de viande; Ris de veau; Filet; Cuisses; Langue; Tripes; Entier; Ailes; Autre
el: Κοπή κρέατος: Πίσω λωρίδα; Κοιλιά; Λεπίδα; Στήθη; Στηθοπλευρά; Μπέργκερ; Μάγουλα; Παϊδάκια; Σπάλα; Μπούτια; Τέλος κοιλιάς; Μπροστινό τέταρτο; Μπροστινή σπάλα; Αλεσμένος; Ζαμπόν; Μπούτι; Καρδιά; Πίσω τέταρτο; Κότσι; Παστό κρέας; Μάγουλο; Νεφρό; Πόδια; Συκώτι; Φιλέτο; Κεφτεδάκια; Λαιμός; Βοδινή ουρά; Rack; Παϊδάκια; Κιλότο; Σέλα; Λουκάνικα; Κότσι; Κόντρα φιλέτο; Στηθοπλευρές; Για τον ώμο; Κόντρα φιλέτο; Χοιρινά παϊδάκια; Κρέας κατσαρόλας; Γλυκάδια; Φιλέτο; Μηροί; Γλώσσα; Πατσάς; Πλήρες; Με φτερά; Άλλο
fi: Leikattu liha: Filee; Vatsa; Lapa; Rinnat; Rinta; Hampurilaiset; Poski; Kyljykset; Etuselkä; Koivet; Kylki; Etuneljännes; Etuolkapää; Jauhettu; Kinkku; Reisipala; Sydän; Takaosa; Kinner; Kuivaliha; Poski; Munuainen; Jalat; Maksa; Lanne; Lihapullat; Niska; Häränhäntä; Teline; Kylkiluut; Takapaisti; Satula; Makkarat; Potka; Entrecote; Lyhyet kylkiluut; Olkapää; Ulkofilee; Grillikylki; Haudutusliha; Kateenkorva; Sisäfilee; Reidet; Kieli; Sisäelimet; Kokonainen; Siivet; Muu
hu: Darabolt hús: Hátszín; Has; Lapocka; Mell; Szegy; Hamburger; Pofa; Karaj; Tarja; Alsó comb; Oldalas; Elülső negyed; Váll elülső része; Darált; Sonka; Comb; Szív; Hátsó negyed; Csülök; Szárított marhahús; Toka; Vese; Láb; Máj; Bélszín; Húsgolyó; Nyak; Ökörfark; Borda; Rostélyos; Far; Gerinc; Kolbász; Lábszár; Lapos hátszín; Short rib; Lapocka; Keresztfartő; Csontos sertésborda; Pörkölt; Borjúmirigy; Vesepecsenye; Comb; Nyelv; Pacal; Egész; Szárny; Egyéb
zh-TW: 切塊: 背帶; 腹部; 板腱; 胸部; 胸部; 漢堡; 臉頰; 排骨; 肩胛肉; 雞腿; 腹脅部; 前半部; 前肩; 地面; 火腿; 腰部; 心; 後半部; 蹄膀; 肉乾; 下巴; 腎; 腿; 肝; 腰部; 肉丸; 脖子; 牛尾; 貨架; 肋骨; 臀肉; 座墊; 香腸; 後腿; 前腰脊部; 牛小排; 肩膀; 沙朗牛排; 豬肋排; 燉肉; 小牛胸腺肉; 里肌肉; 大腿; 舌頭; 牛∕羊肚; 全部; 翅膀; 其他
ja: 肉のカット: バックストラップ; 腹部; ブレード; 胸部; ブリスケット; バーガー; 頬; チョップ; チャック; ドラムスティック; フランク; フォアクォーター; フロントショルダー; グラウンド; ハム; モモ; ハート; 後肢; ホック; ジャーキー; あご; 腎臓; 脚; レバー; ロース; ミートボール; 首; オックステール; ラック; リブ; ランプ; サドル; ソーセージ; シャンク; ショートローイン; ショートリブ; 肩; サーロイン; スペアリブ; シチュー用の肉; スイートブレッド; テンダーロイン; 太もも; 舌; トリッパ; 全体; ウィング; その他
ro-RO: Tăiere carne: Șira spinării; Burtă; Spată; Piept; Cap de piept; Burgeri; Obraji; Cotlete; Ceafă; Copane; Fleică; Carne de pe spate; Umăr față; Tocată; Șuncă; Șold; Inimă; Sfertul posterior; Rasol alb; Pastramă uscată de vită; Falcă; Rinichi; Picioare; Ficat; Spate; Chiftele; Gât; Coadă de vacă; Scăriță; Coaste; Pulpă; Spate și șold; Cârnați; Rasol; Antricot; Costiță; Umăr; Vrăbioară; Partea superioară a coastelor; Carne pentru tocăniță; Momițe; Filet; Coapse; Limbă; Măruntaie; Costiță; Aripi; Altele
lt-LT: Mėsos išpjaustymas: Stirnienos nugarinė; Papilvė; Mentė; Krūtinėlė; Krūtininė; Maltiniai; Pažandė; Nugarinė su kaulu; Pomentė; Blauzdelės; Paslėpsnis; Priekinis ketvirtis; Priekinė mentė; Malta; Kumpis; Užpakalinis kumpis; Širdelių forma; Užpakalinis ketvirtis; Karka; Džiovinta mėsa; Pažandės; Inkstai; Kojos; Kepenys; Nugarinė; Mėsos kukuliai; Kaklas; Jaučio uodega; Nugarinė su šonkauliais; Šonkauliai; Kumpinė; Nugaros mėsa; Dešrelės; Galinė karka; Juosmens dalis; Trumpi šonkauliai; Mentė; Kryžmė; Šonkauliai; Mėsa troškiniui; Kasa; Išpjova; Šlaunelės; Liežuvis; Prieskrandis; Nepjaustyta; Sparneliai; Kita
it: Taglio di carne: Backstrap; Pancia; Lama; Petti; Brisket; Hamburger; Guancia; Braciole; Mandrino; Fusi; Bavetta; Quarto anteriore; Cappello del prete; Terreno; Prosciutto; Coscia; Cuore; Quarto posteriore; Stinco; Carne essiccata; Guanciale; Rene; Gambe; Fegato; Lombo; Polpette; Collo; Coda di bue; Scaffale; Costine; Fesa; Sella; Salsicce; Stinco; Lombo corto; Costine corte; Spalla; Controfiletto; Costine di maiale; Spezzatino; Animelle; Filetto; Cosce; Lingua; Trippa; Intero; Ali; Altro
zh-CN: 切肉: 通脊; 腹脇肉; 胛骨; 胸肉; 胸部; 汉堡; 脸颊; 排骨; 肩肉; 腿肉; 肋腹肉; 前槽肉; 前肩; 落地式; 火腿; 腰腿肉; 心; 后腿肉; 蹄膀; 肉干; 面颊肉; 肾; 腿; 肝; 腰肉; 肉丸; 颈项; 牛尾; 架子; 肋排; 臀腰肉; 鞍座; 香肠; 后腱子; 前腰脊部; 短肋排; 肩膀; 里脊肉; 排骨; 炖肉; 杂碎; 嫩腰肉; 大腿; 舌头; 肚块; 全脂; 翅膀; 其他
hr-HR: Mesna pozicija: Ramstek; Potrbušina; Lopatica; Prsa; Brisket; Burgeri; Obraz; Kotleti; Vratni kotlet; Bataci; Bok; Prednja četvrtina; Prednja lopatica; Mljeveno; Šunka; But; Srce; Stražnja četvrtina; Buncek; Sušeno meso; Vilica; Bubreg; Noge; Jetra; Slabina; Mesne okruglice; Vrat; Goveđi rep; Kotlet; Rebra; Zadnjica; Leđa; Kobasice; Koljenica; Hrbat; Kratka rebra; Lopatica; Ramstek; Rebarca; Meso za dinstanje; Brizla; File; Bedra; Jezik; Tripice; Cijelo; Krila; Ostalo
pt-BR: Corte de carne: Lomo; Barriga; Bife da lâmina; Peitos de ave; Peito bovino; Hambúrgueres; Bochecha; Costeletas; Acém; Coxinhas de frango; Fraldinha; Quarto dianteiro; Paleta bovina; Moído; Presunto; Pernil de carne; Coração; Quarto traseiro; Ossobuco suíno; Carne seca; Papada; Rim; Pernas; Fígado; Lombo; Almôndegas; Pescoço; Rabo de boi; Prateleira; Costelas; Alcatra; Sela; Salsichas; Vitela; Lombo curto; Costelas curtas; Ombro; Picanha; Entrecosto; Ensopado de carne; Timo de boi; Filé mignon; Coxas; Língua; Tripas; Integral; Asas; Outro
th: การตัดเนื้อสัตว์: เอ็นเหลือง; เนื้อส่วนหน้าท้อง; เนื้อใบพาย; เนื้อส่วนอก; บริสเก็ต; เบอร์เกอร์; เนื้อแก้ม; เนื้อติดซี่โครง; เนื้อสันคอ; เนื้อน่อง; เนื้อพื้นท้อง; เนื้อส่วนครึ่งหน้า; เนื้อหัวไหล่ด้านหน้า; พื้นดิน; แฮม; เนื้อส่วนสะโพก; หัวใจ; เนื้อส่วนครึ่งหลัง; ข้อเท้า; เนื้ออบแห้ง; เนื้อส่วนใต้คาง; ไต; ขา; ตับ; เนื้อสัน; มีทบอล; คอ; หางวัว; ขายึดในตู้; ซี่โครง; เนื้อสันเอว; เนื้อส่วนหลัง; ไส้กรอก; เนื้อส่วนที่ติดกับขา; เนื้อช่วงเอว; เนื้อซี่โครงส่วนปลาย; ไหล่; เนื้อเซอร์ลอยน์; ซี่โครงติดเนื้อ; เนื้อสตูว์; ตับอ่อน; เนื้อสันใน; ต้นขา; ลิ้น; ผ้าขี้ริ้ว; ทั้งชิ้น; ปีก; อื่นๆ
en: Meat cut: Backstrap; Belly; Blade; Breasts; Brisket; Burgers; Cheek; Chops; Chuck; Drumsticks; Flank; Forequarter; Front shoulder; Ground; Ham; Haunch; Heart; Hindquarter; Hock; Jerky; Jowl; Kidney; Legs; Liver; Loin; Meatballs; Neck; Oxtail; Rack; Ribs; Rump; Saddle; Sausages; Shank; Short loin; Short ribs; Shoulder; Sirloin; Spareribs; Stew meat; Sweetbreads; Tenderloin; Thighs; Tongue; Tripe; Whole; Wings; Other
pl: Kawałek mięsa: Pasek na plecy; Brzuch; Ostrze; Piersi; Bryzol; Burgery; Policzek; Kotlety; Uchwyt; Pałki; Powierzchnia boczna; Ćwierćtusza przednia; Ramię przednie; Uziemienie; Szynka; Kuper; Serce; Ćwierćtusza tylna; Stęp zwierzęcy; Suszone mięso; Policzek; Nerki; Nogi; Wątroba; Polędwica; Pulpeciki; Szyja; Ogon; Regał; Żeberka; Zadek; Siodło; Parówki; Trzonek; Schab krótki; Krótkie żebra; Bark; Polędwica wołowa; Żebra zapasowe; Mięso gulaszowe; Flaki; Polędwica; Uda; Język; Jelita; Całe; Skrzydła; Pozostałe
de: Fleischstück: Lachs; Bauch; Blatt; Brüste; Bug; Burger; Bäckchen; Koteletts; Chuck; Unterkeule; Flanksteak; Vorderviertel; Vordere Schulter; Boden; Schinken; Hüfte; Herz; Hinterviertel; Hachse; Trockenfleisch; Schweinebacke; Niere; Beine; Leber; Lende; Fleischbällchen; Hals; Ochsenschwanz; Gestell; Rippen; Rumpf; Sattel; Würste; Hesse; Kurze Lende; Kurze Rippen; Schulter; Lendenstück; Rippenspeer; Schmorfleisch; Bries; Filet; Schenkel; Zunge; Kutteln; Ganz; Flügel; Sonstiges
bg-BG: Разфасовка на месо: Еленско филе; Корем; Острие; Гърди; Брискет; Бургери; Буза; Котлети; Плешка; Бутчета; Фланк; Предна четвъртина; Предно рамо; Кайма; Шунка; Бут; Сърце; Задна четвъртина; Джолан; Чипс от месо; Буза; Бъбрек; Крака; Черен дроб; Филета; Кюфтета; Врат; Волска опашка; Котлет; Ребра; Рамстек; Филе; Колбаси; Джолан; Късо филе; Къси ребра; Плешка; Контрафиле; Долни ребра; Задушено месо; Сладки бутчета; Бон филе; Бедра; Език; Шкембе; Цял; Крилца; Други
vi: Cắt thịt: Nạc lưng; Ba chỉ lợn; Vai lợn; Ức; Ức bò; Thịt kẹp; Má; Sườn miếng; Nạc vai; Đùi tỏi; Thăn bụng; Thân trước; Vai trước; Ống tên đặt đất; Giăm bông; Hông – Đùi sau; Trái tim; Thân sau; Bắp giò; Thịt khô; Nọng; Thận; Chân; Gan; Thăn; Thịt viên; Cổ; Đuôi bò; Giá kệ; Sườn; Nạc mông; Yên xe; Xúc xích; Bắp; Thăn nội; Sườn ngắn; Vai; Thăn ngoại; Sườn non; Thịt hầm; Tuyến ức cừu; Thăn chuột; Đùi; Lưỡi; Lá sách; Nguyên; Cánh; Khác
sk-SK: Druh mäsa: Chrbtový popruh; Brucho; Čepeľ; Prsia; Hrudník; Karbonátky; Líca; Kotlety; Pliecko; Paličky; Bok; Predná časť; Predné rameno; Mletý; Šunka; Stehno; Srdce; Zadná časť; Pätný kĺb; Sušené trhané mäso; Čeľusť; Oblička; Nohy; Pečeň; Roštenka; Mäsové guľky; Krk; Hovädzí chvost; Rebrové kosti a sval; Rebrá; Zadné; Sedlo; Klobásy; Lýtko; Zadná roštenka; Zadné rebrá; Ramenný; Sirloin; Rebierka; Dusiť mäso; Brzlíky; Sviečkovica; Stehná; Jazyk; Držky; Celý; Krídelka; Iné
nb: Kjøttdel: Ryggstropp; Mage; Blad; Bryster; Brisket; Burgere; Kinn; Koteletter; Kloss; Trommestikker; Flanke; Forpart; Fremre skulder; Bakke; Skinke; Lår; Hjerte; Bakpart; Kneledd; Jerky; Kinn; Nyre; Ben; Lever; Loin; Kjøttboller; Hals; Oksehale; Stativ; Ribbe; Rumpe; Sal; Pølser; Skinke; Kortloin; Kortribbe; Skulder; Mørbrad; Spareribs; Kokekjøtt; Søtbrød; Indrefilet; Lår; Tunge; Innmat; Hel; Vinger; Annen
sv: Köttsnitt: Ryggband; Mage; Blad; Bröst; Brisket; Hamburgare; Kind; Huggverktyg; Chuck; Trumpinnar; Släppningsyta; Framkvartspart; Främre axeln; Mald; Skinka; Höft; Hjärta; Bakdel; Has; Torkat kött; Käke; Njure; Ben; Lever; Kotlett; Köttbullar; Nacke; Oxsvans; Kuggstång; Revben; Bakdel; Sadel; Korv; Skank; Små kotletter; Små revben; Skuldra; Sirloin; Revbensspjäll; Grytkött; Bräss; Tenderloin; Lår; Tunga; Invälvor; Hel; Vingar; Annat
ko: 고기 부위: 백스트랩; 배; 블레이드; 가슴; 가슴살; 버거; 볼; 찹스; 척; 드럼스틱; 옆구리; 4분의 1; 앞어깨; 그라운드; 햄; 둔부; 하트; 후구; 비절; 육포; 턱; 신장; 다리; 간; 허릿살; 미트볼; 목; 소꼬리; 랙; 갈비; 우둔살; 새들; 소세지; 정강이; 쇼트 로인; 갈비살; 어깨; 등심; 돼지갈비; 스튜 고기; 스위트브레드; 안심; 허벅지; 혀; 양; 전체; 날개; 기타